Illinois, session 104th, HB4300.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Campground Licensing and Recreational Area 5Act is amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 95/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 762)7    Sec. 2. As used in this Act, unless the context requires 8otherwise: 9    (a) "Recreational Area" is any area of land which is 10designed, constructed, operated or maintained either free of 11charge or for revenue purposes for recreational activities. 12The term "Recreational Area" is not meant to include primitive 13areas which evidence no major artificial change from the 14natural surrounding woodlands, croplands, pasturelands, 15prairielands, wetlands, or water areas, and where any 16recreational activities allowed are not for revenue purposes.17    (b) "Recreational Activities" include, but are not limited 18to hunting, fishing, boating, camping, picnicking, hiking, 19pleasure driving, nature study, water skiing, festivals, 20public gatherings and visiting historical, archaeological, 21scenic or scientific sites, or for any purpose, including but 22not limited to educational, vocational and religious 23activities and assemblies.  HB4300 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17156 BAB 30575 b1    (c) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois 2Department of Public Health.3    (d) "Department" means the Illinois Department of Public 4Health.5    (e) "Person" means any individual, group of individuals, 6association, trust, partnership, corporation, person doing 7business under an assumed name, county, municipality, the 8State of Illinois, or any political subdivision or department 9thereof, or any other entity.10    (f) "License" means a certificate issued by the Department 11allowing a person to operate and maintain a campground under 12the provisions of this Act and regulations issued hereunder.13    (g) "Permit" means a certificate issued by the Department 14permitting the construction, alteration and extension of a 15campground under the provisions of this Act and the 16regulations issued hereunder.17    (h) "Sanitary Station" means a facility used for removing 18and disposing of wastes from holding tanks.19    (i) "Service Building" means a structure housing toilet, 20lavatory and such other facilities as may be required by this 21Act and regulations issued hereunder.22    (j) "Recreational Vehicle" means a vehicular-type unit, 23primarily designed as temporary living quarters for 24recreational, camping or travel use, which either has its own 25motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle. The 26basic entities are: travel trailer, camping trailer, truck   HB4300 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17156 BAB 30575 b1camper, motor home and park model home.2    (k) "Dependent Recreational Vehicle" means one that is 3dependent upon a service building for toilet and lavatory 4facilities.5    (l) "Self-contained Recreational Vehicle" means one that 6can operate independent of connections to sewer, water and 7electric systems. It contains a water flush toilet, lavatory, 8and kitchen sink, all of which are connected to water storage 9and sewage holding tanks, located within the trailer.10    (m) "Applicant" means any person making application for a 11license or permit.12    (n) "Owner" means the person in whose name legal title to 13the property is recorded, unless the property is held in land 14trust in which case the owner is the holder of beneficial 15title.16    (o) "Licensee" means any individual having a license or 17permit under this Act, or any member of a firm, partnership, or 18association to which the license is issued under this Act and 19any corporation having a license under this Act.20    (p) "Campground" means a recreational area where 3 or more 21tents, cabins, recreational vehicles or other permanent or 22non-permanent type shelters are erected and maintained for 23camping or where space is provided for camping, temporary 24parking of recreational vehicles or placing of such tents, 25cabins, recreational vehicles or other permanent or 26non-permanent type shelters of any kind for 10 or more persons   HB4300 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17156 BAB 30575 b1for 10 6 or more camping days during a calendar year. It shall 2include any structure, tent, vehicle, enclosure, appurtenances 3or recreational equipment related to or used or intended for 4use as a part of such campground and an area upon which no more 5than 4 mobile homes are located for permanent habitation as 6defined in the Mobile Home and Mobile Home Park Act.7    (q) "Operator" means the person who has been designated by 8the owner as responsible on his behalf for the operation and 9administration of the premises.10    (r) "Camping Day" means any 24 hour period or portion 11thereof during which the participants remain overnight at the 12site.13    (s) "Camping" means the act of resting or establishing 14temporary shelter using a tent, cabin, recreational vehicle or 15other permanent or non-permanent type shelter erected or 16placed on an area of land.17(Source: P.A. 85-959.)